Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB249.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.546 is amended to read as follows:
[Whereas, ]The General Assembly finds and determines that:
(1) State-of-the-art telecommunications is an essential element to the Commonwealth's
initiatives to improve the lives of Kentucky citizens, to create investment, jobs,
economic growth, and to support the Kentucky Innovation Act of 2000;
(2) Streamlined regulation in competitive markets encourages investment in the
Commonwealth's telecommunications infrastructure;
(3) Consumers in the Commonwealth have many choices in telecommunications
services, because competition between various telecommunications technologies
such as traditional telephony, cable television, internet, and other wireless
technologies has become commonplace;
(4) Consumers benefit from market-based competition that offers consumers of
telecommunications services the most innovative and economical services; and
(5) Consumer protections against fraud and abuse, for the provision of affordable basic
service, and for access to emergency services including enhanced 911 must
continue.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 9:03 AM Jacketed